Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-2,169
Disposition of assets not requiring
shareholder approval.

(MBCA
12.01) No approval of the shareholders of a corporation is required, unless
the articles of incorporation otherwise provide:

(1) To sell, lease, exchange,
or otherwise dispose of any or all of the corporation's assets in the usual
and regular course of business;

(2) To mortgage, pledge, dedicate to the repayment
of indebtedness, whether with or without recourse, or otherwise encumber any
or all of the corporation's assets, whether or not in the usual and regular
course of business;

(3)
To transfer any or all of the corporation's assets to one or more corporations
or other entities all of the shares or interests of which are owned by the
corporation; or

(4)
To distribute assets pro rata to the holders of one or more classes or series
of the corporation's shares.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 169.